District of Columbia statutes.
44-605

Mandatory condition precedent.

The conversion approval required by § 44-603 shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of a Certificate of Need or a Certificate of Authority, permit, license, and any other type of official approval, except zoning approval, by an agency or officer or employee of the District government which is necessary for a particular health project.

Oct. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-32, § 6, 44 DCR 4819
Hospital and medical services corporation regulation, exclusivity of provisions, see § 31-3502.
This section is referenced in § 31-3502.
1981 Ed., § 32-555.